West Virginia, session 2025, HB2435.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: §55-2-1. Entry upon or recovery of lands. [Repealed]. NOTE: The purpose of this bill is to repeal a provision of the code relating to the limitation on bringing an action to enter upon or recover lands.Strike-throughs indicate language that would be stricken from a heading or the present law and underscoring indicates new language that would be added. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home